src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON l12_kk ! skakkur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +A+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>kur	 		 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>kan	 		 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:^UUML%>kum		 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s	 		 # ;
 +A:k Pl_Msc1_Uuml ;
 +A:k Sg_Fem1_Uuml ;
 +A:k Pl_Fem1_Uuml ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>t	    	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>t	    	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:^UUML%>kum	 	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s	 		 # ;
 +A:k Pl_Neu1_Uuml ;
 +A:k Pos_Def2	   ;
 +A:k Comp_Ari	   ;

LEXICON l13/1
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 l13 ;
 l1 ;
 
LEXICON l13 ! blankur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
+A: zl13 ;
LEXICON zl13 ! blankur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 Sg_Msc1_Uuml ;
 +Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>um	# ;
 Pl_Msc2_Uuml ;
 +Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>um 	# ;
 Sg_Fem2_Uuml ;
 +Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>		# ;
 Pl_Fem2_Uuml ;
 +Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>um	# ;
 Sg_Neu1_Uuml ;
 +Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>um	# ;
 Pl_Neu2_Uuml ;
 +Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>um	# ;
 Pos_Def2	   ;
 Comp_Ari  ;
 
LEXICON l13_1 ! langur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +A: Sg_Msc1_Uuml ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>um	# ;
 +A: Pl_Msc2_Uuml ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>um 	# ;
 +A: Sg_Fem2_Uuml ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>		# ;
 +A: Pl_Fem2_Uuml ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>um	# ;
 +A: Sg_Neu1_Uuml ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>um	# ;
 +A: Pl_Neu2_Uuml ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>um	# ;
 +A: Pos_Def2	   ;
 +A:^UUML Comp_Ri  ;
 
LEXICON l13_2 ! mangur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +A: Sg_Msc1_Uuml ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>um	# ;
 +A: Pl_Msc2_Uuml ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>um 	# ;
 +A: Sg_Fem2_Uuml ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>		# ;
 +A: Pl_Fem2_Uuml ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>um	# ;
 +A: Sg_Neu1_Uuml ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>um	# ;
 +A: Pl_Neu2_Uuml ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>um	# ;
 +A: Pos_Def2	   ;
 
LEXICON l14 ! harður
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
+A: zl14 ;
LEXICON zl14 ! harður
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 :ð Sg_Msc1_Uuml ;
 :ð Pl_Msc1_Uuml ;
 :ð Sg_Fem1_Uuml ;
 :ð Pl_Fem1_Uuml ;
 +Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>t	     # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>t	     # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:^UUML%>ðum	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ðs	 	 # ;
 :ð Pl_Neu1_Uuml ;
 :ð Pos_Def2	  ;
 :ð Comp_Ari	  ;

LEXICON l15 ! blíður
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
+A: zl15 ;
LEXICON zl15 ! blíður
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 :ð Sg_Msc1  ;
 :ð Pl_Msc1  ;
 :ð Sg_Fem1  ;
 :ð Pl_Fem1  ;
 +Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>tt	   	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>tt	     # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>ðum	 	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ðs	 	 # ;
 :ð Pl_Neu1  ;
 :ð Pos_Def  ;
 :ð Comp_Ari ;

LEXICON l16 ! góður
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
+A: zl16 ;
LEXICON zl16 ! góður
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 :góð Sg_Msc1  ;
 :góð Pl_Msc1  ;
 :góð Sg_Fem1  ;
 :góð Pl_Fem1  ;
 +Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>gott	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>gott	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>góðum	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>góðs	 # ; 
 :góð Pl_Neu1  ;
 :góð Pos_Def  ;
 :bet CRi   ;
 :be  SRi   ;

LEXICON l17 ! bláur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
  +A: zl17pos ;
  +A: zl17comsup ;

LEXICON zl17pos  
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 Sg_Msc1  ;
 Pl_Msc1  ;
 Sg_Fem1  ;
 Pl_Fem1  ;
 +Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>tt	   	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>tt	     # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>um	 	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s	 	 # ;
 Pl_Neu1  ;
 Pos_Def  ;

LEXICON zl17comsup
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 Comp_Ari ;

LEXICON l17_1 ! smáur->smærri->smæstur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
  +A: zl17pos ;
  +A: zl17_1comsup ;

LEXICON zl17_1comsup ! riggar ikki!!!
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 :^IUML%>r CRi ;
 :^IUML SRi	;

LEXICON l18/22
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 l18 ;
 l22 ;
 
LEXICON l18 ! keddur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
+A: zl18 ;
LEXICON zl18 ! keddur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>ddur	 # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>ddan	 # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>ddum	 # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ds	 	 # ;
 :%>dd Pl_Msc1	 ;
 :%>dd Sg_Fem1   ;
 :%>dd Pl_Fem1   ;
 +Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>tt 	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>tt	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>ddum	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ds	 # ;
 :%>dd Pl_Neu1	;
 :%>dd Pos_Def	;
 :%>dd Comp_Ari	;

LEXICON l19 ! nýggjur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
+A: zl19 ;
LEXICON zl19 ! nýggjur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:ggjur	 # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:ggjan	 # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:ggjum	 # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:s	 	 # ;
 :ggj Pl_Msc1	 ;
 :ggj Sg_Fem1   ;
 :ggj Pl_Fem1   ;
 +Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>tt 	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>tt	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>ggjum	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s	 # ;
 :ggj Pl_Neu1	;
 :ggj Pos_Def	;
 :ggj Comp_Ari	;

LEXICON l20 ! stillur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
+A: zl20 ;
LEXICON zl20 ! stillur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:lur	 # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:lan	 # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:lum	 # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:s	 	 # ;
 :l Pl_Msc1 ;
 +Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:la	 	 # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:ra	 	 # ;
 :l Sg_Fem1   ;
 +Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:rar	 	 # ;
 :l Pl_Fem1   ;
 +Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:ra	 	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>t 	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>t	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>lum	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s	 # ;
 :l Pl_Neu1	;
 +Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:ra	 	 # ;
 :l Pos_Def	;
 :l Comp_Ari	;

LEXICON l20_1 ! lekkur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +A+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>kur	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>kan	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>kum	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ks	 # ;
 +A:%>kr 			 Pl_Msc1   ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>k	 # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>ka	 # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>kari	 # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>kar	 # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>krar	 # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>kar	 # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>kar	 # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>kum	 # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>ka	 # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>kra	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>kurt  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>kurt	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>krum	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>kurs	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>kur	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>kur 	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>krum	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>kra	 # ;
 +A:%>kr Pos_Def	;
 +A:%^IUML%>kr Comp_Ri	;

LEXICON l20_2 ! dyggur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +A+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:gur	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:gan	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:gum	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:s	 	 # ;
 +A:g Pl_Msc1 ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:ra	 	 # ;
 +A:g Sg_Fem1   ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:rar	 	 # ;
 +A:g Pl_Fem1   ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:ra	 	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>t 	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>t	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>gum	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s	 # ;
 +A:g Pl_Neu1	;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:ra	 	 # ;
 +A:g Pos_Def	;
 +A:g Comp_Ari	;
 +A:  SRi ;

LEXICON l20_3 ! turrur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +A+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:rur	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:ran	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:rum	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:s	 	 # ;
 +A:r Pl_Msc1 ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:ra	 	 # ;
 +A:r Sg_Fem1   ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:rar	 	 # ;
 +A:r Pl_Fem1   ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:ra	 	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>t 	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>t	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>rum	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s	 # ;
 +A:r Pl_Neu1	;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:ra	 	 # ;
 +A:r Pos_Def	;
 +A:r Comp_Ari	;

LEXICON l20_4 ! sunnur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +A+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:nur	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:nan	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:num	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:s	 	 # ;
 +A:n Pl_Msc1 ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:ra	 	 # ;
 +A:n Sg_Fem1   ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:rar	 	 # ;
 +A:n Pl_Fem1   ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:ra	 	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>t 	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>t	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>num	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s	 # ;
 +A:n Pl_Neu1	;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:ra	 	 # ;
 +A:n Pos_Def	;
 +A:n Comp_Ari	;

LEXICON l20_5 ! fornemmur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +A+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:mur	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:man	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:mum	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:s	 	 # ;
 +A:m Pl_Msc1 ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:ra	 	 # ;
 +A:m Sg_Fem1   ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:rar	 	 # ;
 +A:m Pl_Fem1   ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:ra	 	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>t 	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>t	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>mum	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s	 # ;
 +A:m Pl_Neu1	;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:ra	 	 # ;
 +A:m Pos_Def	;
 +A:m Comp_Ari	;
