src/fst/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Shortadjectives
mjáur+CmpNP/None:mjá l17 ;
smáur+CmpNP/None:smá l17_1 ;
LEXICON Adjectives
nýggjur:ný l19 ;
aktuellur:aktuel l20 ;
proportionellur:proportionel l20 ;
skakkur:skak l12_kk;
slækkur:slæk l12_kk;
almangur:al#mang l13_2 ;
alnarlangur:alnar#lang l13_1 ;
áralangur:ára#lang l13_1 ;
búksvangur:búksvang l13 ;
endilangur:endi#lang l13_1 ;
fjølmangur:fjøl#mang l13_2 ;
framtakssamur:framtakssam l13 ;
hálslangur:háls#lang l13_1 ;
hittingarsamur:hittingarsam l13 ;
klandringarsamur:klandringarsam l13 ;
leggjalangur:leggja#lang l13_1 ;
lívlangur:lív#lang l13_1 ;
mangur:mang l13_2 ;
minningarsamur:minningarsam l13 ;
nakkalangur:nakka#lang l13_1 ;
óskynsamur:óskynsam l13 ;
ridlisamur:ridlisam l13 ;
skankalangur:skanka#lang l13_1 ;
snykblankur:snykblank l13 ;
teigalangur:teiga#lang l13_1 ;
tornæmur:tornæm l13 ;
varsamur:varsam l13 ;
íðulangur:íðu#lang l13_1 ;
beinharður:beinhar l14 ;
flogharður:floghar l14 ;
jarnharður:jarnhar l14 ;
stálharður:stálhar l14 ;
vásharður:váshar l14 ;
avdeyður:avdey l15 ;
bringubreiður:bringubrei l15 ;
droyrreyður:droyrrey l15 ;
fótreyður:fótrey l15 ;
grassíður:grassí l15 ;
heimsvíður:heimsví l15 ;
kjálkasíður:kjálkasí l15 ;
múlasíður:múlasí l15 ;
siðprúður:siðprú l15 ;
tigulreyður:tigulrey l15 ;
dirvisgóður:dirvis# l16 ;
eydnugóður:eydnu# l16 ;
fyndargóður:fyndar# l16 ;
haggóður:hag# l16 ;
holdagóður:holda# l16 ;
kultursgóður:kulturs# l16 ;
matargóður:matar# l16 ;
siðgóður:sið# l16 ;
tolgóður:tol# l16 ;
úrslitagóður:úrslita# l16 ;
afturmjáur:afturmjá l17 ;
blýfríur:blýfrí l17 ;
dimmgráur:dimmgrá l17 ;
eitursmáur:eitur#smá l17_1 ;
ersmáur:er#smá l17_1 ;
evursmáur:evur#smá l17_1 ;
evurssmáur:evurs#smá l17_1 ;
grønbláur:grønblá l17 ;
hálvsmáur:hálv#smá l17_1 ;
javnsmáur:javn#smá l17_1 ;
kápugráur:kápugrá l17 ;
krútsmáur:krút#smá l17_1 ;
ljósgráur:ljósgrá l17 ;
orðfáur:orðfá l17 ;
síðugráur:síðugrá l17 ;
sukurfríur:sukurfrí l17 ;
ørsmáur:ør#smá l17_1 ;
árøddur:árø l18 ;
deyðføddur:deyðfø l18 ;
fjallskøddur:fjallskø l18 ;
heimføddur:heimfø l18 ;
lýddur:lý l18 ;
ótroddur:ótro l18 ;
torgreiddur:torgrei l18 ;
vanskøddur:vanskø l18 ;
alnýggjur:alný l19 ;
brannýggjur:branný l19 ;
foyggjur:foy l19 ;
lýggjur:lý l19 ;
spildurnýggjur:spildurný l19 ;
stríggjur:strí l19 ;
almennur:almen l20_4 ;
átøkkur:átøk l20_1 ;
beinstinnur:beinstin l20_4 ;
bjølgfullur:bjølgful l20 ;
brotdyggur:brotdyg l20_2 ;
bultjúkkur:bultjúk l20_1 ;
burðardyggur:burðardyg l20_2 ;
deyðkyrrur:deyðkyr l20_3 ;
dimmur:dim l20_5 ;
dummur:dum l20_5 ;
elddyggur:elddyg l20_2 ;
ellidøkkur:ellidøk l20_1 ;
fákunnur:fákun l20_4 ;
fingratjúkkur:fingratjúk l20_1 ;
floytifullur:floytiful l20 ;
fólkastyggur:fólkastyg l20_2 ;
framtjúkkur:framtjúk l20_1 ;
gagnturrur:gagntur l20_3 ;
gjøgnturrur:gjøgntur l20_3 ;
gravkvirrur:gravkvir l20_3 ;
greytartjúkkur:greytartjúk l20_1 ;
grimmur:grim l20_5 ;
grummur:grum l20_5 ;
havdimmur:havdim l20_5 ;
heilavillur:heilavil l20 ;
høvuðstyggur:høvuðstyg l20_2 ;
javndimmur:javndim l20_5 ;
javntjúkkur:javntjúk l20_1 ;
knæstinnur:knæstin l20_4 ;
kúrrur:kúr l20_3 ;
kyrrur:kyr l20_3 ;
litadimmur:litadim l20_5 ;
magnfullur:magnful l20 ;
mannstyggur:mannstyg l20_2 ;
navnkunnur:navnkun l20_4 ;
niðurtjúkkur:niðurtjúk l20_1 ;
nýturrur:nýtur l20_3 ;
óbekvemmur:óbekvem l20_5 ;
ósnøggur:ósnøg l20_2 ;
pappírstunnur:pappírstun l20_4 ;
ráðvillur:ráðvil l20 ;
skráturrur:skrátur l20_3 ;
snøggur:snøg l20_2 ;
steinkvirrur:steinkvir l20_3 ;
tarmafullur:tarmaful l20 ;
tjúkkur:tjúk l20_1 ;
tortryggur:tortryg l20_2 ;
trinnur:trin l20_4 ;
útgrunnur:útgrun l20_4 ;
beinharður:beinhar l14 ;
grótharður:gróthar l14 ;
meitilharður:meitilhar l14 ;
stormharður:stormhar l14 ;
vindharður:vindhar l14 ;
skønnur:skøn l20_4 ;
smekkfullur:smekkful l20 ;
fornemmur:fornem l20_5 ;
lekkur:lek l20_1 ;
kvæmur:kvæm l13/1 ;
trídimensionellur:trí#dimensionel l20 ;
fullturrur:full#tur l20_3 ;
avsneiddur:av#snei l18 ;
bibbaræddur:bibba#ræ l18/22 ;
fólkaræddur:fólka#ræ l18/22 ;
myrkaræddur:myrka#ræ l18/22 ;
deyðaræddur:deyða#ræ l18/22 ;
stangræddur:stang#ræ l18/22 ;
flogræddur:flog#ræ l18/22 ;
trøllræddur:trøll#ræ l18/22 ;
kvennræddur:kvenn#ræ l18/22 ;
hálvræddur:hálv#ræ l18/22 ;
óræddur:ó#ræ l18/22 ;
veitsluskrýddur:veitslu#skrý l18 ;
sjódyggur:sjó#dyg l20_2 ;
eldkvæmur:eld#kvæm l13/1 ;
sprongkvæmur:sprong#kvæm l13/1 ;
spreingikvæmur:spreingi#kvæm l13/1 ;
illkvæmur:ill#kvæm l13/1 ;
nærkvæmur:nær#kvæm l13/1 ;
loftkvæmur:loft#kvæm l13/1 ;
nákvæmur:ná#kvæm l13/1 ;
ovurviðkvæmur:ovur#við#kvæm l13/1 ;
undurvænur:undur#væn l13/1 ;
